North Carolina, session 2025, HB869.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Administration, in consultation with any other State
agency or department it deems necessary, shall implement the use of the dynamic symbol of
access in place of the international symbol of access for signs indicating access for, or use by,
persons with disabilities in all State buildings and parking areas. The symbol required under this
section shall be a logo with a dynamic character leaning forward with a sense of movement, be
readily identifiable, and be simply designed with no secondary meaning. An example of the icon
is available for public use from the "The Accessible Icon Project," https://accessibleicon.org. The
new symbol of access shall signify equivalent facilitation and accessibility as the international
symbol of access. The requirement of this section applies to signs installed or replaced on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-7(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Tests. – To demonstrate physical and mental ability, a person must pass an
examination. The examination may include road tests, vision tests, oral tests, and, in the case of
literate applicants, written tests, as the Division may require. The tests must ensure that an
applicant recognizes the handicapped international symbol of access and the dynamic symbol of
access, as defined in G.S. 20-37.5. The Division may not require a person who applies to renew
a license that has not expired to take a written test or a road test unless one or more of the
following applies:
(1) The person has been convicted of a traffic violation since the person's license
was last issued.
(2) The applicant suffers from a mental or physical condition that impairs the
person's ability to drive a motor vehicle.
The Division shall require sign and symbol testing upon initial issuance of a license. The
Division shall require vision testing as a part of required in-person, in-office renewals of a
license.
The Division may not require a person who is at least 60 years old to parallel park a motor
vehicle as part of a road test. A person shall not use an autocycle to complete a road test under
this subsection."
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 20-37.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-37.5. Definitions.
*H869-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply throughout this Article
to the defined words and phrases and their cognates:
(1) "Distinguishing license plate" means a license plate that displays the
International Symbol of Access or the dynamic symbol of access, using the
same color, size of plate, and size of letters or numbers as a regular plate.
(1a) Dynamic symbol of access. – The symbol of wheelchair access depicting a
logo with a dynamic character leaning forward with a sense of movement as
implemented for use by the Department of Administration.
(1a)(1b) Guardian. – Any of the following:
a. Custodian. – As defined in G.S. 7B-101(8).
b. General guardian. – As defined in G.S. 35A-1202(7).
c. Guardian of the person. – As defined in G.S. 35A-1202(10).
…
(4) "Removable windshield placard" means a two-sided, hooked placard which
includes on each side:
a. The International Symbol of Access, Access or the dynamic symbol
of access which is at least three inches in height, centered on the
placard, and is white on a blue shield;
b. An identification number;
c. An expiration date that is visible from at least 20 feet and the month
and year of expiration; and
d. The seal or other identification of the issuing authority."
SECTION 3.2. No later than January 1, 2026, all distinguishing license plates and
removable window placards issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles shall bear the dynamic
symbol of access.
SECTION 4. G.S. 136-30(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Public Vehicular Areas. – Except as provided in this subsection, all traffic signs and
other traffic control devices placed on a public vehicular area, as defined in G.S. 20-4.01, must
conform to the Uniform Manual. The owner of private property that contains a public vehicular
area may place on the property a traffic control device, other than a sign designating a parking
space for handicapped persons, as defined in G.S. 20-37.5, that differs in material from the
uniform device but does not differ in shape, size, color, or any other way from the uniform device.
The owner of private property that contains a public vehicular area may place on the property a
sign designating a parking space for handicapped persons that uses the dynamic symbol of access
or the international symbol of access, as defined in G.S. 20-37.5, and differs in material and color
from the uniform sign but does not differ in shape, size, or any other way from the uniform
device."
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 869-First Edition